California statutes. Vehicle Code
(2) Reducing the millions of single passenger automobile trips of five miles or less that Californians take each year will significantly reduce the pollution caused by fuel emissions and aggravated by automobile congestion.

(3) Electric personal assistive mobility devices that meet the definition in Section 313 operate solely on electricity and employ advances in technology to safely integrate the user in pedestrian transportation.

(4) Electric personal assistive mobility devices enable California businesses, public officials, and individuals to travel farther and carry more without the use of traditional vehicles, thereby promoting gains in productivity, minimizing environmental impacts, and facilitating better use of public ways.

(b) The Legislature is adding this article as part of its program to promote the use of no-emission transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 106, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21280.5.

For purposes of this article, an electric personal assistive mobility device is defined in Section 313.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 979, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative March 1, 2003, pursuant to Section 21283 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

21281.

Every electric personal assistive mobility device, or EPAMD, shall be equipped with the following safety mechanisms:

(a) Front, rear, and side reflectors.

(b) A system that enables the operator to bring the device to a controlled stop.

(c) If the EPAMD is operated between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise, a lamp emitting a white light that, while the EPAMD is in motion, illuminates the area in front of the operator and is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front of the EPAMD.

(d) A sound emitting device that can be activated from time to time by the operator, as appropriate, to alert nearby persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 979, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative March 1, 2003, pursuant to Section 21283 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

21281.5.

(a) A person shall not operate an EPAMD on a sidewalk, bike path, pathway, trail, bike lane, street, road, or highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent having due regard for weather, visibility, pedestrians, and other conveyance traffic on, and the surface, width, and condition of, the sidewalk, bike path, pathway, trail, bike lane, street, road, or highway.

(b) A person shall not operate an EPAMD at a speed that endangers the safety of persons or property.

(c) A person shall not operate an EPAMD on a sidewalk, bike path, pathway, trail, bike lane, street, road, or highway with willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property.

(d) A person operating an EPAMD on a sidewalk, bike path, pathway, trail, bike lane, street, road, or highway shall yield the right-of-way to all pedestrians on foot, including persons with disabilities using assistive devices and service animals that are close enough to constitute a hazard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 106, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21282.

Notwithstanding Section 21966, for the purpose of assuring the safety of pedestrians, including seniors, persons with disabilities, and others using sidewalks, bike paths, pathways, trails, bike lanes, streets, roads, and highways, a city, county, or city and county may, by ordinance, regulate the time, place, and manner of the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in Section 313, and their use as a pedestrian pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 467, including limiting, prohibiting entirely in the local jurisdiction, or prohibiting use in specified areas as determined to be appropriate by local entities. State agencies may limit or prohibit the time, place, and manner of use on state property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 979, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative March 1, 2003, pursuant to Section 21283 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Operation of Electrically Motorized Boards [21290. - 21296.]

21290.

(a) For purposes of this article, “bikeway” is defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) For purposes of this article, an “electrically motorized board” is defined in Section 313.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 3.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21291.

An electrically motorized board shall be operated only by a person who is 16 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 3.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21292.

A person shall not operate an electrically motorized board upon a highway, bikeway, or any other public bicycle path, sidewalk, or trail, unless that person is wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets the standards described in Section 21212.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 3.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21293.

(a) Every electrically motorized board operated upon a highway during darkness shall be equipped with all of the following:

(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a lamp emitting a white light that, while the electrically motorized board is in motion, illuminates the highway in front of the operator and is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front of the electrically motorized board.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a red reflector on the rear that is visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle.

(3) Except as
 provided in subdivision (d), a white or yellow reflector on each side that is visible from a distance of 200 feet from the sides of the electrically motorized board.

(b) A lamp or lamp combination, emitting a white light, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 300 feet in front of the electrically motorized board, may be used in lieu of the lamp required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) A red reflector, or reflectorizing material meeting the requirements of Section 25500, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle, may be used in lieu of the reflector required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) A white or yellow reflector, or reflectorizing material meeting the requirements of
 Section 25500, attached to the operator and visible from a distance of 200 feet from the sides of the electrically motorized board, may be used in lieu of the reflector required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 3.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21294.

(a) An electrically motorized board shall only operate upon a highway designated with a speed limit of 35 miles per hour or less, unless the electrically motorized board is operated entirely within a designated Class II or Class IV bikeway.

(b) A person shall not operate an electrically motorized board upon a highway, bikeway, or any other public bicycle path, sidewalk, or trail, at a speed in excess of 15 miles per hour.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person shall not operate an electrically motorized board at a speed greater than is reasonable or prudent having due regard for weather, visibility, pedestrian and vehicular traffic, and the surface and width of the highway, bikeway, public
 bicycle path, sidewalk, or trail, and in no event at a speed that endangers the safety of any person or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 302.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21296.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to operate an electrically motorized board upon a highway while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any drug.

(b) A person arrested for a violation of this section may request to have a chemical test made of his or her blood or breath for the purpose of determining the alcoholic or drug content of that person’s blood pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 23612, and, if so requested, the arresting officer shall have the test performed.

(c) A conviction for a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars
 ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 777, Sec. 3.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Horseback Riding [21300. - 21300.]

21300.

(a) A person under 18 years of age shall not ride an equestrian animal upon a paved highway unless that person is wearing a properly fitted and fastened helmet that meets the standards of either the American Society for Testing and Materials or the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission, or standards subsequently established by those entities.

(b) A person riding an equestrian animal upon a paved highway during hours of darkness, as defined in Section 280, shall do one of the following:

(1) Wear reflective gear or have reflective gear on the equestrian animal that shall be visible from a
 distance of 500 feet on the rear and the sides when directly in front of the lawful upper beams of headlamps on a motor vehicle.

(2) Have a lamp emitting a white light attached to either the person or the equestrian animal that is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front of and from the sides of the equestrian animal.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a person is not required to wear a helmet or reflective gear while riding an equestrian animal when participating in a parade or festival, or while crossing a paved highway from an unpaved highway.

(d) In a civil action, a violation of subdivision (a) or (b)
 does not establish negligence as a matter of law or negligence per se for comparative fault purposes, but negligence may be proven as a fact without regard to the violation.

(e) A charge under this section shall be dismissed when the person charged alleges in court, under oath, that the charge against the person is the first charge against that person under this section, unless it is otherwise established in court that the charge is not the first charge against the person.

(f) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) The parent or legal guardian having control or custody of an
 unemancipated minor whose conduct violates this section shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of the fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   (AB 974)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Traffic Signs, Signals, and Markings [21350. - 21468.]



  ARTICLE 1. Erection and Maintenance [21350. - 21376.]

21350.

The Department of Transportation shall place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, appropriate signs, signals, and other traffic control devices as required hereunder, and may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, such appropriate signs, signals, or other traffic control devices as may be authorized hereunder, or as may be necessary properly to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this code, or to warn or guide traffic upon the highways. The Department of Transportation may, with the consent of the local authorities, also place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, in or
 along city streets and county roads, appropriate signs, signals, and other traffic control devices, or may perform, or cause to be performed, such other work on city streets and county roads, as may be necessary or desirable to control, or direct traffic, or to facilitate traffic flow, to or from or on state highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

21351.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions shall place and maintain or cause to be placed and maintained such traffic signs, signals and other traffic control devices upon streets and highways as required hereunder, and may place and maintain or cause to be placed and maintained, such appropriate signs, signals or other traffic control devices as may be authorized hereunder or as may be necessary properly to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this code or local traffic ordinances or to warn or guide traffic.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21351.3.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, speed limit, speed advisory, and mileage signs, or suitable plates affixed to or near existing signs, which indicate speeds and distances both in common standards of measures, as specified in Section 12302 of the Business and Professions Code, and in measures of the metric system authorized by Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 462.)
-------------------------------------------

21351.5.

The Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may erect stop signs to require the traffic on a highway to stop before crossing any railroad grade crossing designated by the agency having jurisdiction of the highway as a major crossing with a demonstrated need for stop signs, except a railroad grade crossing which is controlled by automatic signals, gates, or other train-actuated control devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

21351.7.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, appropriate signs along city streets or county roads which indicate that a deaf child is near.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21352.

The Department of Transportation may erect stop signs at any entrance to any state highway and whenever the department determines that it is necessary for the public safety and the orderly and efficient use of the highways by the public, the department may erect and maintain, or cause to be erected and maintained, on any state highway any traffic control signal or any official traffic control device regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles upon the highway, allocating or restricting the use of specified lanes or portions of the highway by moving vehicular traffic, establishing crosswalks at or between intersections, or restricting use of the
 right-of-way by the public for other than highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21353.

No local authority, except by permission of the Department of Transportation, shall erect or maintain any stop sign or traffic control signal in such manner as to require the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway or any railroad grade crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21354.

Subject to the provisions of Section 21353, a local authority may designate any highway under its jurisdiction as a through highway and may erect stop signs at entrances thereto or may designate any intersection under its exclusive jurisdiction as a stop intersection and erect stop signs at one or more entrances thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21355.

(a) Stop signs erected under Section 21350, 21351, 21352, or 21354 may be erected either at or near the entrance to an intersection.

The Department of Transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may erect stop signs at any location so as to control traffic within an intersection.

When a required stop is to apply at the entrance to an intersection from a one-way street with a roadway of 30 feet or more in width, stop signs shall be erected both on the left and the right sides of the one-way street at or near the entrance to
 the intersection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, stop signs shall not be erected at any entrance to an intersection controlled by official traffic control signals, nor at any railroad grade crossing which is controlled by automatic signals, gates, or other train-actuated control devices except where a stop sign may be necessary to control traffic on intersecting highways adjacent to the grade crossing or when a local authority determines, with the approval of the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 21110, that a railroad grade crossing under its jurisdiction presents a danger warranting a stop sign in addition to a train-activated control device.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), local authorities, with respect to streets under their jurisdiction, are not required to conform lawfully established intersection configurations existing on January 1, 1985, to meet the
 requirements of subdivision (a) until January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 700, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21356.

The Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may erect yield right-of-way signs at the entrances to intersections or highways. Such yield right-of-way signs shall not be erected upon the approaches to more than one of the intersecting streets.

Yield right-of-way signs shall be located at or near the entrance to the intersection or highway where motorists are required to yield the right-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 287.)
-------------------------------------------

21356.5.

Local authorities may place signs, mirrors, or other visual or audible devices at exits from alleys that are under their jurisdiction to warn drivers to watch for pedestrians and bicyclists on the sidewalk prior to exiting the alley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21357.

Speed restriction signs may, but need not, be erected upon any highway other than a state highway at the entrance thereof into a business or residence district unless required in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

21358.

Where one or more business and residence districts are contiguous, or where, as authorized by this code, speed is to be restricted between two districts, either business or residence, or at the end of either thereof, speed restriction signs affecting traffic on other than state highways as required by Sections 21357 and 21359 need be erected and maintained only at the boundaries of the outside limits of the area in which speed is to be restricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

21359.

Whenever the Department of Transportation or a local authority as authorized by this code determines and declares a speed limit different from the limit otherwise applicable under Sections 22349 and 22352, appropriate speed restriction signs shall be erected and maintained at the outside entrance of the highway or portion thereof upon which the special speed limit is applicable. The special speed limit is not effective until appropriate signs have been erected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21360.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may, within the reasonable exercise of their police power and subject to Section 21353, place and maintain official traffic control devices to regulate traffic at the intersection of a highway and a private road or driveway. Official traffic control devices may be erected at or near such intersection, except no such device shall be erected upon a private road or driveway without consent of the owner thereof. When official traffic control devices are installed and in operation, the private road or driveway shall be deemed a highway only for the purpose of determining the existence and location of an
 intersection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21361.

(a) When the outermost boundaries of two or more intersections are confined within a distance of 200 feet, the Department of Transportation in respect to state highways, and a local authority with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, shall have the power to designate a single intersection by the installation and operation of traffic signals which may be supplemented by signs or markings. When so designated, the single intersection shall be the legal intersection for the purposes of traffic movement and regulation.

(b) Whenever a single intersection has been designated by the
 Department of Transportation or by local authorities as set forth in subdivision (a), the department or such authorities may designate marked crosswalks at certain locations within the intersection or contiguous thereto, and when the marked crosswalks are established, they shall constitute the only crosswalks at the intersection. The department or the local authorities shall erect signs prohibiting pedestrian crossing at locations which, except for the provisions of this section, would constitute unmarked crosswalks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21362.

Railroad warning approach signs shall be erected by local authorities upon the right-hand side of each approach of every highway under their jurisdiction to a grade crossing of a railroad or electric interurban railway at a reasonable distance from the crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 450.)
-------------------------------------------

21362.5.

(a) (1) Railroad and rail transit grade crossings may be equipped with an automated rail crossing enforcement system if the system is identified by signs clearly indicating the system’s presence and visible to traffic approaching from each direction.

(2) Only a governmental agency, in cooperation with a law enforcement agency, may operate an automated rail crossing enforcement system.

(b) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code,
 or any other provision of law, photographic records made by an automated rail crossing enforcement system shall be confidential, and shall be made available only to governmental agencies and law enforcement agencies for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 425.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21363.

Detour signs shall be erected at the nearest points of detour from that portion of a highway, or from any bridge, which is closed to traffic while under construction or repair.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21364.

The Department of Transportation may authorize an owner of land adjacent to a state highway to erect and maintain signs to indicate the existence of those places where livestock regularly and frequently cross a state highway, and any sign so erected and maintained shall be an official sign. The department shall prescribe the size, shape and character of the signs, which shall be uniform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21365.

The Department of Transportation, with respect to state highways in open range country, and the board of supervisors of each county, with respect to county highways under its jurisdiction, may place and maintain appropriate signs indicating that the territory traversed is open livestock range and warning against the danger of livestock on the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21366.

At each signal-controlled intersection on streets and highways, there shall be a street name sign clearly visible to traffic approaching from all directions. The cost of erecting and maintaining the street name signs may be paid out of funds derived from the Highway Users Tax Fund or the Motor Vehicle License Fee Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------

21367.

(a) As provided in Section 125 of the Streets and Highways Code and in Section 21100 of this code, respectively, the duly authorized representative of the Department of Transportation or local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, including, but not limited to, persons contracting to perform construction, maintenance, or repair of a highway, may, with the approval of the department or local authority, as the case may be, and while engaged in the performance of that work, restrict the use of, and regulate the movement of traffic through or around, the affected area whenever the traffic would endanger
 the safety of workers or the work would interfere with or endanger the movement of traffic through the area. Traffic may be regulated by warning signs, lights, appropriate control devices, or by a person or persons controlling and directing the flow of traffic.

(b) It is unlawful to disobey the instructions of a person controlling and directing traffic pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) It is unlawful to fail to comply with the directions of warning signs, lights, or other control devices provided for the regulation of traffic pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 748, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21368.

Whenever a marked pedestrian crosswalk has been established in a roadway contiguous to a school building or the grounds thereof, it shall be painted or marked in yellow as shall be all the marked pedestrian crosswalks at an intersection in case any one of the crosswalks is required to be marked in yellow. Other established marked pedestrian crosswalks may be painted or marked in yellow if either (a) the nearest point of the crosswalk is not more than 600 feet from a school building or the grounds thereof, or (b) the nearest point of the crosswalk is not more than 2,800 feet from a school building or the grounds thereof, there are no
 intervening crosswalks other than those contiguous to the school grounds, and it appears that the facts and circumstances require special painting or marking of the crosswalks for the protection and safety of persons attending the school. There shall be painted or marked in yellow on each side of the street in the lane or lanes leading to all yellow marked crosswalks the following words, “SLOW—SCHOOL XING,” except that such words shall not be painted or marked in any lane leading to a crosswalk at an intersection controlled by stop signs, traffic signals, or yield right-of-way signs. A crosswalk shall not be painted or marked yellow at any location other than as required or permitted in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 232.)
-------------------------------------------

21369.

All speed restriction signs in place on January 1, 1960, are hereby ratified and confirmed and shall establish the applicable prima facie speed limit unless and until changed pursuant to engineering and traffic surveys provided for by this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1317.)
-------------------------------------------

21370.

The Department of Transportation, or its duly authorized representatives with the approval of the department, while engaged in the construction of a state highway upon new alignment may restrict the use of and regulate the movement of traffic upon any highway intersecting the project at or near the place of intersection whenever such work interferes with or endangers the safe movement of traffic through the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21372.

The Department of Transportation and local authorities shall, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, establish and promulgate warrants to be used as guidelines for the placement of traffic control devices near schools for the purpose of protecting students going to and from school. Such devices may include flashing signals. Such warrants shall be based upon, but need not be limited to, the following items: pedestrian volumes, vehicle volumes, width of the roadway, physical terrain, speed of vehicle traffic, horizontal and vertical alignment of the roadway, the distance to existing traffic control devices, proximity to the school, and the degree of
 urban or rural environment of the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21373.

The governing board of any school district may request the appropriate city, county, city and county or state agency to install traffic control devices in accordance with the warrants established pursuant to Section 21372. Within 90 days thereafter, the city, county, city and county or state agency involved shall undertake an engineering and traffic survey to determine whether the requested crossing protection meets the warrants established pursuant to Section 21372. The city, county, city and county, or state agency involved may require the requesting school district to pay an amount not to exceed 50 percent of the cost of the survey. If it is determined that such requested
 protection is warranted, it shall be installed by the city, county, city and county or state agency involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1061.)
-------------------------------------------

21374.

A local authority may mark or paint the surface of any street or highway under its jurisdiction, or of any state highway, with the approval of the Department of Transportation, with lines, arrows, or other suitable symbols for the purpose of directing visitors and tourists to local points of interest. No such marking shall be of a color or configuration which, as determined by the Department of Transportation, would cause it to be confused with an official traffic control device.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 472.)
-------------------------------------------

21375.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, directional signs on freeways indicating the location of the freeway off ramp which may be used to reach a public or private postsecondary education institution having an enrollment of either 1,000 or more full-time students or the equivalent in part-time students, at the request of the institution. No signs shall be erected pursuant to this subdivision until the department has received donations from private sources covering the costs of erecting the signs.

(b) The
 Department of Transportation shall place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, freeway directional signs for any institution described in subdivision (a) for which freeway directional signs had previously been erected and which has, on or after January 1, 1980, moved to another location, if that move was done to contribute to the improvement of the institution, as determined by the department. Freeway directional signs erected pursuant to this subdivision shall be at no cost to the institution.

(c) Subdivision (a) applies to a public or private postsecondary institution which is located within two miles of the freeway in a major metropolitan area, within four miles of the freeway in an urban area, or within five miles of the freeway in a rural area. Subdivision (b) applies to a public or private postsecondary education institution which has moved to a location which is within the distances specified in this
 subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21376.

The Department of Transportation shall place and maintain on each major state highway entering the state within 500 feet after the state line, a sign that states that the abandonment or dumping of any animal is a crime punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or confinement in a county jail of up to six months, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Official Traffic Control Devices [21400. - 21401.]

21400.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall, after consultation with local agencies and public hearings, adopt rules and regulations prescribing uniform standards and specifications for all official traffic control devices placed pursuant to this code, including, but not limited to, stop signs, yield right-of-way signs, speed restriction signs, railroad warning approach signs, street name signs, lines and markings on the roadway, and stock crossing signs placed pursuant to Section 21364.

(b) The Department of Transportation shall, after notice and public hearing, determine and publicize the specifications for uniform types of warning signs, lights, and devices to be placed upon a
 highway by a person engaged in performing work that interferes with or endangers the safe movement of traffic upon that highway.

(c) Only those signs, lights, and devices as are provided for in this section shall be placed upon a highway to warn traffic of work that is being performed on the highway.

(d) Control devices or markings installed upon traffic barriers on or after January 1, 1984, shall conform to the uniform standards and specifications required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 690, Sec. 2.   (AB 43)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

(a) Except as provided in Section 21374, only those official traffic control devices that conform to the uniform standards and specifications promulgated by the Department of Transportation shall be placed upon a street or highway.

(b) Any traffic signal controller that is newly installed or upgraded by the Department of Transportation shall be of a standard traffic signal communication protocol capable of two-way communications. A local authority may follow this requirement.

(c) In recognition of the state and local interests served by the action made optional for a local authority in subdivision (b), the Legislature encourages local agencies to continue taking the action formerly mandated by this section. However nothing in this subdivision may be construed to impose any liability on a local agency that does not continue to take the formerly mandated action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 889, Sec. 6.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Offenses Relating to Traffic Devices [21450. - 21468.]

21450.

Whenever traffic is controlled by official traffic control signals showing different colored lights, color-lighted arrows, or color-lighted bicycle symbols, successively, one at a time, or in combination, only the colors green, yellow, and red shall be used, except for pedestrian control signals, and those lights shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles, operators of bicycles, and pedestrians as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 277, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2005, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective July 25, 2005.   Note: This amended version was effectively added on July 25, 2005, because the prior version, as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 277, Sec. 1, had been repealed on January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21450.5.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following definitions:

(1) “Accessible pedestrian signal” or “APS” means an integrated device that communicates information about the “WALK” and “DON’T WALK” intervals at signalized intersections in nonvisual formats, including audible tones, speech messages, and vibrotactile surfaces, to
 pedestrians who are blind or have low vision.

(2) “Leading pedestrian interval” or “LPI” means an official traffic control signal that advances the “WALK” signal for three to seven seconds while the red signal halting traffic continues to be displayed on parallel through or turning traffic.

(3) “Pedestrian hybrid beacon” means a special type of hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an unsignalized location to assist pedestrians in crossing a street or highway at a marked crosswalk. Following an actuation by a pedestrian, a pedestrian hybrid beacon face shall display to motorists and bicyclists a flashing CIRCULAR YELLOW signal indication, followed by a steady CIRCULAR YELLOW signal indication, followed by both steady CIRCULAR RED signal indications during the pedestrian walk interval and followed by alternating flashing CIRCULAR RED signal indications during the
 pedestrian change interval. Upon termination of the pedestrian change interval, the pedestrian hybrid beacon faces shall revert to a dark, not illuminated, condition. When a pedestrian makes an actuation, they shall wait for a “WALK” signal to appear on the pedestrian head in order to proceed. After the countdown, a “DON’T WALK” signal appears, and the pedestrian hybrid beacon has to be activated again to initiate a “WALK” signal.

(4) “Replaced” or “replacement” means the relocation or exchange in place of all existing signal poles at an intersection with new signal poles.

(5) A “traffic-actuated signal” is an official traffic control signal, as specified in Section 445, that displays one or more of its indications in response to the presence of
 traffic detected by mechanical, visual, electrical, or other means.

(6) “Caltrans” means the Department of Transportation.

(b) Upon the first placement of a traffic-actuated signal or replacement of the loop detector of a traffic-actuated signal, the traffic-actuated signal shall, to the extent feasible and in conformance with professional traffic engineering practice, be installed and maintained to detect lawful bicycle or motorcycle traffic on the roadway.

(c) Cities, counties, and cities and counties shall not be required to comply with the provisions contained in subdivision (b) until the Department of Transportation, in consultation with these entities, has established uniform standards, specifications,
 and guidelines for the detection of bicycles and motorcycles by traffic-actuated signals and related signal timing.

(d) (1) At crosswalks with state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signals and pedestrian hybrid beacons with pedestrian signal heads, the walk indication and other visual signals, including, but not limited to, LPIs and countdown pedestrian signals, shall comply with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (CA MUTCD), 4E.11. These pedestrian signal heads shall have an APS pushbutton or touch-free APS that activates “WALK” and “DON’T WALK” intervals and other visual signals at signalized intersections in nonvisual formats, including, but